Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-102
Sections; applicability to corporations.

The provisions of sections 76-101 to 76-123 apply to corporations unless the context indicates a more limited applicability.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 2, p. 595;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1002;

R.S.1943, § 76-102.